Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2708
Foreclosure consultant, defined.

(1) Foreclosure consultant means a person who:

(a) Does not, directly or through an associate, take or acquire any interest in or title to the residence in foreclosure; and

(b) In the course of such person's business, vocation, or occupation, makes a solicitation, representation, or offer to a homeowner to perform, in exchange for compensation from the homeowner or from the proceeds of any loan or advance of funds, a service that the person represents will do any of the following:

(i) Stop or postpone a foreclosure sale;

(ii) Obtain a forbearance from a beneficiary under a deed of trust, mortgage, or other lien;

(iii) Assist the homeowner in exercising a right to cure a default;

(iv) Obtain an extension of the period within which the homeowner may cure a default;

(v) Obtain a waiver of an acceleration clause contained in an evidence of debt secured by a deed of trust, mortgage, or other lien on a residence in foreclosure or contained in such deed of trust, mortgage, or other lien;

(vi) Assist the homeowner to obtain a loan or an advance of funds;

(vii) Avoid or reduce the impairment of the homeowner's credit resulting from the recording of a notice of election and demand for sale, commencement of a judicial foreclosure action, any foreclosure sale or the granting of a deed in lieu of foreclosure, or any late payment or other failure to pay or perform under the evidence of debt, the deed of trust, or other lien securing such evidence of debt;

(viii) In any way delay, hinder, or prevent the foreclosure upon the homeowner's residence; or

(ix) Assist the homeowner in obtaining from the beneficiary, mortgagee, or grantee of the lien in foreclosure, or from counsel for such beneficiary, mortgagee, or grantee, the remaining or excess proceeds from the foreclosure sale of the residence in foreclosure.

(2) Foreclosure consultant does not include:

(a) A person licensed to practice law in this state while performing any activity related to the person's attorney-client relationship with a homeowner or any activity related to the person's attorney-client relationship with the beneficiary, mortgagee, grantee, or holder of any lien being enforced by way of foreclosure;

(b) A holder or servicer of an evidence of debt or the attorney for the holder or servicer of an evidence of debt secured by a deed of trust or other lien on any residence in foreclosure while the person performs services in connection with the evidence of debt, lien, deed of trust, or other lien securing such debt;

(c) A person doing business under any law of this state or the United States, which law regulates banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, credit unions, insurance companies, title insurers, insurance producers, or escrow companies authorized to conduct business in the state, while the person performs services as part of the person's normal business activities, an affiliate or subsidiary of any of such entities, or an employee or agent acting on behalf of any of such entities;

(d) A person originating or closing a loan in a person's normal course of business, if, as to that loan:

(i) The loan is subject to the requirements of the federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974, 12 U.S.C. 2601 et seq., as the act existed on July 18, 2008; or

(ii) With respect to any junior mortgage or home equity line of credit, the loan is subordinate to and closed simultaneously with a qualified first mortgage loan under subdivision (2)(d)(i) of this section or is initially payable on the face of the note or contract to an entity included in subdivision (2)(c) of this section;

(e) A judgment creditor of the homeowner;

(f) A title insurance company or title insurance agent authorized to conduct business in this state while performing title insurance and settlement services;

(g) A person licensed as a real estate broker, associate broker, or real estate salesperson pursuant to the Nebraska Real Estate License Act while the person engages in any activity for which the person is licensed; or

(h) A nonprofit organization that solely offers counseling or advice to homeowners in foreclosure or loan default, unless the organization is an associate of the foreclosure consultant.

Laws 2008, LB123, § 8.